Maine, session 132, LD1113.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §1602, sub-§1, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. A, §2,
is amended to read:
B. Second, the court shall determine the maximum term of imprisonment to be
imposed by considering all other relevant sentencing factors, both aggravating and
mitigating, appropriate to the case. Relevant sentencing factors include, but are not
limited to, the character of the individual, the age of the individual at the time the
conduct forming the basis for the conviction occurred, the individual's criminal history,
the effect of the offense on the victim and the protection of the public interest.
Page 1 - 132LR1989(03)